Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1307YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 735 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514F.10 Cost-sharing contribution 1 ââ calculation. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, copayment, 5 coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket cost obligation 6 imposed by a health benefit plan on a covered person. 7 b. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, 8 enrollee, or other individual participating in a health benefit 9 plan. 10 c. âHealth benefit planâ means the same as defined in 11 section 510B.1. 12 d. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 13 514J.102. 14 e. âPharmacy benefits managerâ means the same as defined in 15 section 510B.1. 16 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 17 requirements of section 514C.6, for purposes of calculating 18 a covered personâs overall contribution to any cost-sharing 19 requirement under a health benefit plan, a health carrier or 20 a pharmacy benefits manager shall include any amount paid by 21 the covered person or paid by any other person on behalf of the 22 covered person. 23 b. If the contribution calculation under paragraph âaâ will 24 result in the ineligibility of a health savings account under 25 section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, the contribution 26 calculation for the health savings account shall apply only 27 after the covered person has satisfied the minimum deductible 28 under section 233 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that for 29 items or services that are preventive care pursuant to section 30 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, the contribution 31 calculation under paragraph âaâ shall apply regardless of 32 whether the minimum deductible under section 233 of the 33 Internal Revenue Code has been satisfied. 34 3. a. This section applies to the following classes of 35 -1- LSB 1307YH (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 735 health benefit plans delivered, issued for delivery, continued, 1 or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026: 2 (1) Individual or group accident A and sickness insurance 3 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 4 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 5 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 6 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 7 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 8 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 9 chapter 509A. 10 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified 11 disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital confinement 12 indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, 13 long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical expense 14 coverage as defined by the commissioner of insurance, 15 disability income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a 16 supplement to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or 17 similar insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 18 4. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 19 chapter 17A to administer this section. 20